Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8602
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired Act are to assist blind persons in gaining remunerative employment, to enlarge economic opportunities for blind persons, to increase the available occupational range and diversity for blind persons, and to stimulate other efforts that aid blind persons in becoming self-supporting.

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 2.